Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.405

Entities required to designate and maintain registered agent.

The following shall designate and maintain a registered agent in this state:

(1) A domestic entity; and

(2) A registered foreign entity.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1402.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.